District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.130

Penalties — Nonpayment of fees.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 232, ch. 269, § 130
Sept. 2, 1957, 71 Stat. 572, Pub. L. 85-254, § 32
Sept. 3, 1963, 77 Stat. 140, Pub. L. 88-111, § 1(11)
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.130.
1981 Ed., § 29-399.31.
1973 Ed., § 29-941.